src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Monophthongisation rule uá:o0 part 2: Vowel shortening for uá" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  for uábbi -> obbijn  čuál%^RCi%^WG%>in tuái4jâl%^CSH%^VBACK%^RVSH%>âm
á:0 <=> u: _ Cns:+ i %^WG: %^CLEN: %^SVLOW: %> i:  ;  !RULE RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ i %^WG: %^RVSH: %> i:  ;  !RULE RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ [i|u|â|u2:] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE RV  !sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
        u: _ Cns:+ u %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]  ; !RULE RV  ! uáinu
        u: _ Cns:+ i2:i %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  !RULE RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ u2:u ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)  %>   ; !RULE RV  !*


"Monophthongisation rule u:o and root vowel change u:o, special rule for olmooš and contract verbs"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
u:o <=>  [.#.|#] _     Cns:+ u:o (%^SV:) [š|ž]  %^WG: (%^SLEN:)  %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV !! ulmu : olmooš, olmožin, carefully with only initial vowel
                 _ á:  Cns:+ u2:u             (%^CLEN:)  (%^RLEN:)          %>  ; !RULE RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:+ i2:i                              %>    [i|i3:i|Cns]      ;  !RULE RV 
     [Cns|.#.|#] _ á:  Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|u]   (Cns:+)     (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:)     %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV   ! oođđim            
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ [i|u|â] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]   ; !RULE RV  !sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
                 _ á:0 Cns:* i %^WG:          %^CLEN: %^SVLOW: %> i:  ; !RULE RV 
    		     _ á:o Cns:+ Vow: j %^ÁI: %^WG: ; !RULE RV  !puáhháá : poovij ! XXX
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ i %^WG:                   %^RVSH: %> i: ; !RULE RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* i %^WG:                 (%^RLEN:) %> i: ;  !RULE RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* u2:u   ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:          (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE RV 
             Cns _     Cns:+ e: %^VBACK: [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !

!!€ uáinu2>đ
!!€ o0inu>đ


"Diphthong rule uá:uo and uá:oo, part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
á:o <=> u5:  _ Cns:+ u2:u   ([%^WG: | %^CSH:])  (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)    %>  ;  !RULE RV !uá to uo
        u5:  _ Cns:+ u  %^VBACK:  (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV !uá to uo
        u5:  _ Cns:* [u2:|u]  ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RVSH:)    %> [m|h|u]   ;  !RULE RV ! should not hit pu5áhtu2%>o but ču5árvu2 OBS
        u:   _ Cns:+ i                           %^WG:   %> i: ;  !RULE RV  ! 
        u:   _ Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|u]  (Cns:+)        (%^WG:|%^CSH:)(%^CLEN:)  %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV  ! oođđim  
        u:   _ Cns:+ Vow:      j     %^ÁI:           %^WG: [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !puáhháá poovij 
        u    _ Cns:+ Vow:+ (Cns:) ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^FCD: â [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV !stuárrá:stuorrâ
        u:o  _ Cns:+ i                          %^WG: %^RLEN:  %> i: ; !RULE RV 
        u:o  _ Cns:+ :i    Cns:          %^ÁI: %^WG: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !viäskár:veeskir  viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
        u:o  _ Cns:* u2:u   ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)   %^RLEN: [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE RV lagt til clen vback og o tt



"Diphthongisation e to iä, part 1" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   
e:i <=>   _  Vow: Cns:+ [i2:|e:|i:|i3:] [%^EA:|%^EX:]  ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:]) ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:])   [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !! 1) P1: e > i; ergi:iärgán 1, veerdi:viärdán ! eeč^RCi^EA^CLEN^RVSH>s
          _ %^RV: Cns:+ [u|á|o|â2:] ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;   !RULE RV 
          _ %^RV: Cns:+ u i4: %^WG:  [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV  ! čevžuin čiävžui če%^RVvžui4%^WG>
         \Vow _ e:    Cns:+ [á | u | o | â2: ] Triggers:*  %> [s | o| č |p |m | á |h] ;  !RULE RV  ! piävu>s piähho>on piäváččii  - not meendu
         \Vow _ e:    Cns:+ á   [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])  [%>|.#.] \[Cns | Vow]  ;  !RULE RV  ! veerrá%^EA%^CSH>
         \Vow _ e:    Cns:+ á  (%^CSH:) %^VHIGH:   [%>|.#.] \[Cns | Vow]  ;  !RULE RV  ! peeh%^RCá%^VHIGH> peeh%^RC 
          _ [%^RV:|e:]    Cns:+ u2:o Triggers:*  %> ; !RULE RV
		Cns: _  [Triggers: - %^EA:]*  %> i: ;  !RULE SV 
        Cns: _  %> ä p ; !RULE SV  !! mánuttep : mánuttiäpán


"Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 1"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  ahhu:áhu
a:á <=> [Cns|.#.|#] _ %^RV: Cns: Cns: u [š|ž] %^CSH: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; !RULE RV 


"Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  ahhu:ááhu
%^RV:á <=> [Cns|.#.|#] a:á _ Cns: Cns: u [š|ž] %^CSH: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.]   ;  !RULE RV !! 1)
                \Vow: o: _ Cns:+ u [i4: | j | š | ž]  %^WG: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV  !! 2) poccu puásui





"ie to iä in Illative and Sg3" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  kiem´ni -> kiämnán, veerdi : viärdán peerru2%^CLEN%^VHIGH%^RVSH%>o
e:ä <=> [i | e: ] _  Cns:+ Vow:  [%^EA:|%^EX:] Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV 
        [i | e: ] _  Cns:+ Vow:  Triggers:* %^VHIGH:  [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV 
        :i        _  Cns:+ [u|á|o|â2:] (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV  ! čevžuin čiävžui
        :i        _  Cns:+ u2:o Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV  ! piähhoo
         \Vow :i  _   Cns:+ á  (%^CSH:) %^VHIGH:   [%>|.#.] \[Cns | Vow]  ;  !RULE RV  ! eellá%^CSH%^VHIGH
         \Vow :i  _  Cns:+    â2:   %^VHIGH:  %> m ;   !RULE RV   !PrfPrc Err/Orth




"Diphthongisation uo:uá"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   
o:á <=> u _ Cns:+ u: [i4: | j | š | ž] %^WG: ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV !! 1) cuobbuu cuábui, kuođhu po^RVrru^EWG>i
 		u _ Cns:+ á       %^CSH: ; !RULE RV 
        u _ Cns:+ â [%^EA:|%^EX:] %^CSH: ; !RULE RV 
        u _ Cns:+ [o|u|á|i|u2:] %^VHIGH: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV  !! 4) vuoll- > vuállus ruáttá


"ye to uá and uo, part 1" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  Part 1 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán  
y:u <=> _ e:  Cns:+ Vow:  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:]) (%^RLEN:)   [%>|.#.] ;   !RULE RV 
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:|%^VHIGH:) ([%^RVSH: |%^RLEN:] ) %> [i:|j|i3:|š|ž] ; !RULE RV  !syej%^RCi%^RVSH%^CLEN%>in
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i  (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:) %> [m | h] ; !RULE RV  
        _ :o  Cns:+ [ â:|á |u2:] (Cns:+) ([%^WG: | %^CSH:])  (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV ! [i | Cns] ; ! ryettâ^WG^VBACK^RLEN>m
        _ :o  Cns:+ :i %^WG: %^CLEN: %^SVLOW: %> i: ; !RULE RV 
        _ :o  Cns:  Cns: :i  %^WG: %^CLEN:  %^RVSH: %> [i:|i3:] ; !RULE RV 
        _ :o  Cns:+ i2:i %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  !RULE RV 
        _ e:  Cns:+ [:Vow | i6:] (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ([%^RVSH: |%^RLEN:] ) [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE RV 


"ye to uá, part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuálán
e:á <=> y: _  Cns:+ [Vow: - u2:]  [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:|%^CLEN:|%^WG:) (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] \[i:|j |i3:| š | ž ]  ; !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns:+ [u:|á|o|â2:] (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^VHIGH:) (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] \[l|i] ;  !RULE RV  ! not ryetáim:
        y: _  Cns:+ i6: %^VHIGH: [%>|.#.] \[l|i] ;  !RULE RV  ! not ryetáim:
        y: _  Cns:+ u2:o Triggers:* [%>|.#.]  ;  !RULE RV  ! not ryetáim:

!!€ kyel^RCi3^EA^CLEN>m
!!€ kuállá00>m

"ye to uo, part 2 "
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  Part 2 of ye to uá for kyeli : kuolijn
e:o <=> y: _  Cns:+ :i (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) %> [i:|j |i3:| š | ž ] ; !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns:+ :i (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)  %^VBACK:  ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) %> [m|h] ;  !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns:+ [ â:|á ] (Cns:+)  ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]   [%>|.#.] ; ![i | Cns ] ; !RULE RV  !ryettâ^WG^VBACK^RLEN>m
        y: _  Cns:+ :i %^WG: %^CLEN: %^SVLOW: %> i: ; !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns: Cns: :i  %^WG: %^CLEN: %^RVSH: %>  [i:|i3:]  ; !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns:+ i2:i %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  !RULE RV 
        y: _  Cns:+  u2:u  Triggers:*   %>  ;  !RULE RV 

"uá to ye and uo to ye, part 1" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  Part 1 luámmán : lyeme čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%>
u:y <=> _ á: Cns:+ á: (%^SV:) [l|m:|s|n:|r] [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] (%^FCD:) %^WG: [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV 
        _ o: Cns:+ [e ([%^WG:|%^CLEN:]) %> e|i %^CSH: %> h] ; !RULE RV 

!!€ vuolle^CLEN>en
!!€ vyelle0>en

"uá to ye, part 2"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  Part 2 luámmán : lyeme
á:e <=> [:y|o] _ Cns:+ á: (%^SV:) [l|m:|s:|n:|r] [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] (%^FCD:) %^WG:  [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE RV  !cuággás : cyegis čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN

"uo to ye, part 2"
o:e <=> u:y _ Cns:+ [e ([%^WG:|%^CLEN:]) %> e|i %^CSH: %> h] ; !RULE RV 
!vyelleen, vyeleem,vyelih



!! !Second syllable rules

"Second syllable vowel change á to e or i in 3syll stems"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN%> pu5árrás%^ÁI%^WG%>umos
Vx:Vy <=> Cns: _ (%^SV:) (Cns:)  Vz: (%^FCD:) %^WG: (%^CLEN:) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) ([%^SVSH:|%^SLEN:])  [.#.|%> [#|⎈|i n|i d|n|d]] ;  !RULE SV  !no change when the word is added a new foot  \Syll 
          Cns: Vx: _ s  Vz: %^WG: ; !lohhes
       where Vx in ( á    á    a   )
             Vy in ( e    i    e   )
             Vz in ( %^ÁE %^ÁI %^ÁE) 
       matched ;

!!€ puttás^ÁE^WG>
!!€ pu0tes00>

! sollâ
"Stemvowel shortening  áá and aa to e or i in 3syll"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ puttás- > putes, triggers are ^ÁE and ^ÁI
Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ Vx: (Cns:) Vz: %^WG: ;  !RULE SV  !!!!!%^CSH:
       where Vx in ( á    á    a   )
             Vz in ( %^ÁE %^ÁI %^ÁE) 
       matched ;

!rejected
!!€ nahhaar^ÁE^WG>
!!€ na0v0er00>



 
"Stem vowel e to a for a root vowel."
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  alge to aalgan
e:a <=> a (%^RV:) Cns:+ _  (%^SV:) %^EA: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:|%^WG:]) (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !RULE SV 

!!€ a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN>š
!!€ a0lgaa00>š


!!€ a^RVlge^SV^EA^SLEN
!!€ a0lgaa00

!!€ a^RVlge^EA^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ aalga000>n

!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^EA^CLEN^SLEN>m
!!€ va0hhaa000>m

"Stem vowel e to á for other root vowel"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  if e stem
e:á <=> [o|i|u] (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:) %^EA: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN: |%^WG:]) ([%^RLEN: |%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE SV !njuunáád

"Stem vowel i to á for other root vowel."
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  e.g. säämi > Ill sáámán 
Vx:á <=> [:e|:i|:ä|:á|ä:0] (%^RV:)  Cns:+ _   %^EA: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN: |%^WG:]) ([%^RLEN: |%^RVSH:])  [%>|.#.] [i: | n | d | m | s |š ] ;  !RULE SV !uábbám iännásis
    where Vx in ( i i2 i3 ) ;

"Stem vowel i to â for other root vowel, as a common error."
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  e.g. säämi > Ill Err/Orth sáámân 
Vx:â <=> [:e|:i|:ä|:á|ä:0] (%^RV:)  Cns:+ _   %^EX: ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:]) ([%^RLEN: |%^RVSH:])  [%>|.#.] [i: | n | d | m | s |š ] ;  !RULE SV !uábbám iännásis
    where Vx in ( i i2 i3 ) ;


"Stem vowel i to e in front of j"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
Vx:e <=> Cns _ %> [j [Vow - â]|e] ; !RULE SV  !not hit karri>jân ! 
	where Vx in (i i2) ;


! kalgá -> kalga

"Stem vowel â to a in Pl Nom -h"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  silbâ to siilbah  %^WG%^RLEN%>hlove%>h
â:a <=> :Cns (%^RC:) _  TriggersnotFCVD:* %> h [l | .#.|%>] ; !RULE SV 


!!€ so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN>h
!!€ soo0la00>h

"Stem vowel â > á change before i"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ sollâ to sooláid 
â:á <=> _ (%^SV:) (%^WG:) (%^RLEN:|%^CLEN:|%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW: %> [:i|:j] ;  !RULE SV 


!!€ so^RVllâ^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in 
!!€ soo0lá000>in

"Stem vowel â > e change before e"
â:e <=> _ (%^WG:) (%^RLEN:|%^CLEN:|%^SLEN:) %^SVLOW: %> e ;  !RULE SV 

"Optional stem vowel â > e change before e"
!â:e  =>  _ [l l | d d | t :t ] [ e %> [e|h] | i %> [m|h|i3:]] ; 
â:e  <=>  _ [l: l | d: d | t: :t ] [ e (%^CSH:) %^IUML: %> [e|h] | i %^IUML: %> [m|h|i3:]] ; 


! posâlâdd>eh
! posâlâddeh/posâleddeh
! hámiin prs d1 (een), p3 (eh)
!        prt s1 (im), s2 (ih), p3 (ii)
! galgá leat sihke e ja â 3. stávvalis

        
!"Stem vowel i3:e"
! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
!i3:e <=> _   %^WG: %^RVSH:  .#.   ; !RULE SV  !kyele
!i3:e <=>  _  (%^SV:) [Triggers: - %^EA:]+  %>  [t |h|s|e]  ; !RULE SV  !hyeneest

"Stem vowel i3:0"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ 
i3:0 <=> _  e Triggers:*  [.#.|#|%>] ; !RULE SV  !kyele temp løsning
